Florida, session 2026, HB485.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
18
19 Section 1. This act may be cited as "Shawnya's Law."
20 Section 2. Subsection (2) of section 741.28, Florida
21 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) is added to that
22 section, to read:
23 741.28 Domestic violence; definitions.—As used in ss.
24 741.28-741.31:
25 (2) "Domestic violence" means any assault, aggravated
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 485 2026
26 assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault, sexual
27 battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, false
28 imprisonment, marriage fraud, voyeurism or digital voyeurism of
29 intimate areas including bedrooms, bathrooms, or any place in
30 which there is an expectation of privacy, or any other criminal
31 offense resulting in physical injury or death of one family or
32 household member by another family or household member.
33 (5) "Marriage fraud" means an intentional deception,
34 omission, or misrepresentation made by a foreign national, as
35 defined in s. 106.08(12)(a)1.d. or e., when entering into a
36 marriage with a citizen or lawful resident of the United States
37 for the primary purpose of evading state or federal law or
38 receiving benefits that inure solely by virtue of the marriage,
39 and such foreign national engages in acts of manipulation,
40 abuse, coercion, and emotional or financial harm.
41 Section 3. Paragraph (d) of subsection (8) of section
42 741.30, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (e),
43 paragraph (b) of subsection (3) is amended, and a new paragraph
44 (d) is added to subsection (8) of that section, to read:
45 741.30 Domestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of
46 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary
47 injunction; issuance of injunction; statewide verification
48 system; enforcement; public records exemption.—
49 (3)
50 (b) The verified petition shall be in substantially the
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 485 2026
51 following form:
52 PETITION FOR
53 INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION
54 AGAINST DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
55 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under penalties
56 of perjury that the following statements are true:
57 (a) Petitioner resides at: ...(address)...
58 (Petitioner may furnish address to the court in a separate
59 confidential filing if, for safety reasons, the petitioner
60 requires the location of the current residence to be
61 confidential.)
62 (b) Respondent resides at: ...(last known address)...
63 (c) Respondent's last known place of employment: ...(name
64 of business and address)...
65 (d) Physical description of respondent:....................
66 Race........
67 Sex........
68 Date of birth........
69 Height........
70 Weight........
71 Eye color........
72 Hair color........
73 Distinguishing marks or scars........
74 (e) Aliases of respondent:.................................
75 (f) The respondent is:
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 485 2026
76 1. The spouse or former spouse of the petitioner.........
77 2. or is Any other person related by blood or marriage to
78 the petitioner.........
79 3. or is Any other person who is or was residing within a
80 single dwelling unit with the petitioner, as if a
81 family.........
82 4. , or is A person with whom the petitioner has a child
83 in common, regardless of whether the petitioner and respondent
84 are or were married or residing together, as if a
85 family.........
86 5. An alien fiancé(e) in the United States on a K-1
87 nonimmigrant visa or an alien spouse in the United States on a
88 Permanent Resident Card (green card).........
89 (g) The following describes any other cause of action
90 currently pending between the petitioner and respondent:.........
91
92 The petitioner should also describe any previous or pending
93 attempts by the petitioner to obtain an injunction for
94 protection against domestic violence in this or any other
95 circuit, and the results of that attempt:........................
96
97 Case numbers should be included if available.
98 (h) Petitioner is either a victim of domestic violence or
99 has reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger
100 of becoming a victim of domestic violence because respondent
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 485 2026
101 has: ...(mark all sections that apply and describe in the spaces
102 below the incidents of violence or threats of violence,
103 specifying when and where they occurred, including, but not
104 limited to, locations such as a home, school, place of
105 employment, or visitation exchange)...
106 ................................................................
107 ................................................................
108 ....committed or threatened to commit domestic violence
109 defined in s. 741.28, Florida Statutes, as any assault,
110 aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault,
111 sexual battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, false
112 imprisonment, marriage fraud, voyeurism or digital voyeurism of
113 intimate areas including bedrooms, bathrooms, or any place in
114 which there is an expectation of privacy, or any other criminal
115 offense resulting in physical injury or death of one family or
116 household member by another. With the exception of persons who
117 are parents of a child in common, the family or household
118 members must be currently residing or have in the past resided
119 together in the same single dwelling unit.
120 ....previously threatened, harassed, stalked, or physically
121 abused the petitioner.
122 ....attempted to harm the petitioner or family members or
123 individuals closely associated with the petitioner.
124 ....threatened to conceal, kidnap, or harm the petitioner's
125 child or children.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 485 2026
126 ....intentionally injured or killed a family pet.
127 ....used, or has threatened to use, against the petitioner
128 any weapons such as guns or knives.
129 ....physically restrained the petitioner from leaving the
130 home or calling law enforcement.
131 ....a criminal history involving violence or the threat of
132 violence (if known).
133 ....another order of protection issued against him or her
134 previously or from another jurisdiction (if known).
135 ....destroyed personal property, including, but not limited
136 to, telephones or other communication equipment, clothing, or
137 other items belonging to the petitioner.
138 ....engaged in a pattern of abusive, threatening,
139 intimidating, or controlling behavior composed of a series of
140 acts over a period of time, however short.
141 ....committed marriage fraud or engaged in behavior or
142 conduct that leads the petitioner to have reasonable cause to
143 believe the respondent committed marriage fraud.
144 ....engaged in any other behavior or conduct that leads the
145 petitioner to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in
146 imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence.
147 (i) Petitioner alleges the following additional specific
148 facts: ...(mark appropriate sections)...
149 ....A minor child or minor children reside with the
150 petitioner whose names and ages are as follows:..................
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 485 2026
151
152 ....Petitioner needs the exclusive use and possession of
153 the dwelling that the parties share.
154 ....Petitioner is unable to obtain safe alternative housing
155 because:.........................................................
156
157 ....Petitioner genuinely fears that respondent imminently
158 will abuse, remove, or hide the minor child or children from
159 petitioner because:..............................................
160
161 ....Petitioner is a victim of marriage fraud by a foreign
162 national, as defined in s. 106.08(12)(a)1.d. or e., Florida
163 Statutes, and has suffered the following abuse; coercion;
164 manipulation; or reputational, emotional, or financial harm as a
165 result:..........................................................
166
167 (j) Petitioner genuinely fears imminent domestic violence
168 by respondent.
169 (k) Petitioner seeks an injunction: ...(mark appropriate
170 section or sections)...
171 ....Immediately restraining the respondent from committing
172 any acts of domestic violence.
173 ....Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of
174 domestic violence.
175 ....Awarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive use
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 485 2026
176 and possession of the dwelling that the parties share or
177 excluding the respondent from the residence of the petitioner.
178 ....Providing a temporary parenting plan, including a
179 temporary time-sharing schedule, with regard to the minor child
180 or children of the parties which might involve prohibiting or
181 limiting time-sharing or requiring that it be supervised by a
182 third party.
183 ....Designating that the exchange of the minor child or
184 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange
185 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by
186 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if
187 temporary time-sharing of the child is awarded to the
188 respondent.
189 ....Establishing temporary support for the minor child or
190 children or the petitioner.
191 ....Directing the respondent to participate in a batterers'
192 intervention program.
193 ....Providing any terms the court deems necessary for the
194 protection of a victim of domestic violence, or any minor
195 children of the victim, including any injunctions or directives
196 to law enforcement agencies.
197 (8)
198 (d) Within 24 hours after the court issues an injunction
199 for protection against domestic violence in which the petitioner
200 alleged to be a victim of marriage fraud or the petitioner
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 485 2026
201 declared in the petition for such injunction that the respondent
202 is an alien fiancé(e) or alien spouse, the clerk of the court
203 must electronically transmit a copy of the petition; temporary
204 injunction, if any; and a certified copy of the order of
205 injunction to State Board of Immigration Enforcement for
206 investigation. A representative from the State Board of
207 Immigration Enforcement must initiate contact with the
208 petitioner within 30 days after receipt of the certified copy of
209 the order of injunction.
210 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb485-00